Idaho, session 2025, H0465.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support
Program's Division of Student Support the following amounts to be expended
according to the designated programs from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
A. OPERATIONS DIVISION:
FROM:
Public Schools Other Income
Fund $10,000,000
Public School Endowment Income
Fund 5,185,200
TOTAL $15,185,200


B. CHILDREN'S PROGRAMS DIVISION:
FROM:
Federal Grant
Fund $9,500,000
DIVISION TOTAL $24,685,200
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Public Schools Educational Support Program's
Division of Student Support is hereby reduced by the following amounts for
the designated programs from the Public School Income Fund for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Administrators Division $1,485,200
Operations Division 15,712,700
TOTAL $17,197,900
SECTION 3. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Con-
troller shall transfer $17,197,900 from the Public School Income Fund to the
General Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the pe-
riod July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. That Section 33-1004E, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-1004E. DISTRICT'S SALARY-BASED APPORTIONMENT. Each district shall
be entitled to a salary-based apportionment calculated as provided in this
section.
(1) To determine the apportionment for instructional staff, take
the amounts indicated on the career ladder table plus the amounts associ-
ated with the additional education allocation amounts pursuant to section
33-1004B, Idaho Code, and calculate the weighted average. The amount so
determined shall be multiplied by the district staff allowance for instruc-
tional staff determined as provided in section 33-1004(2), Idaho Code.
Full-time instructional staff salaries shall be determined from a salary
schedule developed by each district and submitted to the state department of
education. No full-time instructional staff member or pupil service staff
member on the residency compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum
dollar amount on the career ladder residency compensation rung pursuant to
section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.
(2) Effective July 1, 2022, no full-time instructional staff member
or pupil service staff member on the professional or advanced professional
compensation rung shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the
career ladder professional compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B,
Idaho Code, for the applicable fiscal year.


(3) Effective July 1, 2025, no full-time instructional staff member or
pupil service staff member on the advanced professional compensation rung
shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the advanced profes-
sional compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for the
applicable fiscal year.
(4) If an instructional staff member has been certified by the national
board for professional teaching standards, the staff member shall receive
two thousand dollars ($2,000) per year for five (5) years from the year in
which national board certification was earned. The district staff allot-
ment shall be increased by two thousand dollars ($2,000) for each national
board-certified instructional staff member who earned national board cer-
tification; provided however, that no such awards shall be paid for the pe-
riod July 1, 2010, through June 30, 2011, nor shall any liabilities accrue
or payments be made pursuant to this section in the future to any individu-
als who would have otherwise qualified for a payment during this stated time
period. The resulting amount is the district's salary-based apportionment
for instructional staff. For purposes of this section, teachers qualifying
for the salary increase shall be those who have been recognized as national
board-certified teachers as of July 1 of each year.
(5) To determine the apportionment for pupil service staff, take
the amounts indicated on the career ladder table plus the amounts associ-
ated with the additional education allocation amounts pursuant to section
33-1004B, Idaho Code, and calculate the weighted average. If the district
does not employ any pupil service staff, the district's pupil service staff
average salary shall equal the district's instructional staff average
salary for purposes of calculating pupil service salary-based apportion-
ment. The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district staff al-
lowance for pupil service staff determined pursuant to section 33-1004(3),
Idaho Code. Full-time pupil service staff salaries shall be determined from
a salary schedule developed by each district and submitted to the state de-
partment of education. The resulting amount is the district's salary-based
apportionment for pupil service staff. No full-time pupil service staff
member shall be paid less than the minimum dollar amount on the career ladder
residency compensation rung pursuant to section 33-1004B, Idaho Code, for
the applicable fiscal year.
(6) To determine the apportionment for district administrative staff,
first determine the district average experience and education index by plac-
ing all eligible certificated administrative employees on the statewide
index provided in section 33-1004A, Idaho Code. The resulting average is the
district index. If the district does not employ any administrative staff,
the district administrative index shall equal the statewide average index
for purposes of calculating administrative salary-based apportionment.
On and after July 1, 2024 2025, the district administrative staff index
shall be multiplied by the base salary of forty-four thousand four hundred
forty-six dollars ($44,446) forty-six thousand six hundred sixty-eight dol-
lars ($46,668). The amount so determined shall be multiplied by the district
staff allowance for administrative staff determined as provided in section
33-1004(4), Idaho Code. The resulting amount is the district's salary-based
apportionment for administrative staff. forty-three thousand five hundred
eighty-three dollars ($43,583)


(7) On and after July 1, 2024 2025, to determine the apportionment for
classified staff, multiply thirty-nine thousand nine hundred sixty-six dol-
lars ($39,966) forty-one thousand nine hundred sixty-four dollars ($41,964)
by the district classified staff allowance determined as provided in section
33-1004(5), Idaho Code. The amount so determined is the district's appor-
tionment for classified staff. thirty-nine thousand one hundred ninety dol-
lars ($39,190)
(8) The district's salary-based apportionment shall be the sum of the
apportionments calculated in subsections (1), (4), (5), (6) and (7) of this
section, plus the benefit apportionment as provided in section 33-1004F,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. Of the additional amounts appropriated in Section 1 of this
act for the Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Student
Support, the following amounts shall be considered expended from the listed
funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Public School Other Income Fund $10,000,000
Public School Endowment Income Fund 5,185,200
Federal Grant Fund 9,500,000
TOTAL $24,685,200
SECTION 6. Of the reduced amounts in Section 2 of this act for the
Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Student Sup-
port, $17,197,900 shall be considered reduced from the amounts considered
expended from the Public School Income Fund for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 7. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.


SECTION 8. AGE COMPLIANCE. The State Department of Education shall ver-
ify compliance with Section 33-201, Idaho Code, prior to distributing any
state funds to a school district or public charter school for services re-
lated to children. Verification shall occur prior to distributing funds in
the November payment pursuant to Section 33-1009, Idaho Code.
SECTION 9. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 10. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 303, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Public Schools Educational Support Program's
Division of Student Support $9,500,000 from the Federal Grant Fund to be ex-
pended for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 11. Of the additional amounts in Section 10 of this act for the
Public Schools Educational Support Program's Division of Student Support,
$9,500,000 shall be considered expended from the Federal Grant Fund for the
period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 12. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 10 and 11 of this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 9 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.